Washington statutes.
RCW 39.52.015

Validation of prior bond issues.

That all bonds heretofore voted or issued, and which may have been or may hereafter be issued by any county, city or town, for any of the purposes authorized by the preceding section as hereby amended, including general fund bonds issued for the purpose of refunding special utility fund bonds or warrants, shall be validated and have the same force and effect as though said section had been in full force and effect at the time said bonds were either authorized or issued.

[ 1917 c 145 s 2; RRS s 5618.]